Minnesota, session 2025-2026, HF496.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin APPROPRIATION; WE WIN INSTITUTE, INC.new text end new text begin $15,000,000 in fiscal year 2026 is appropriated from the general fund to the commissioner of employment and economic development for a grant to WE WIN Institute, Inc., a 501(c)(3) nonprofit organization, to continue and expand the renovation of their currently owned facilities to provide academic, social, and culturally specific programming and food services for black students in the city of Minneapolis. This appropriation may be used for the property acquisition of an additional property in the city of Minneapolis to be used for a meeting and gathering space to work with and support community-based organization partnerships. This appropriation may also be used for the predesign, design, construction, furnishing, equipping, and renovation of the WE WIN facilities and the additional property to be purchased under this section. This appropriation is onetime and is available until the project is completed or abandoned, subject to Minnesota Statutes, section 16A.642. This appropriation is in addition to the appropriation in Laws 2023, chapter 71, article 1, section 14, subdivision 105. new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective the day following final enactment. new text end